en: dried coriander leaf
fr: feuille de coriandre séchée
hu: száritott korianderlevél

en: burnet
de: Pimpinelle
fr: pimprenelle
hr: izgorjeti
it: burnet

en: dill
af: dille
am: እንስላል
ar: شبت
ba: укроп
be: кроп
bg: копър
bn: শুলফা
br: fanouilh-gad
bs: kopar
ca: anet
co: finochju
cs: kopr
cy: llysiau'r gwewyr
da: dild
de: dill
dv: ދަމުއި
el: άνηθος
eo: aneto
es: eneldo
et: till
eu: ezamihilu
fa: شوید
fi: tilli
fo: dild
fr: aneth
ga: lus mín
gl: aneto
he: שבת ריחני
hi: सोआ
hr: kopar
ht: lanni
hu: kapor
hy: սամիթ
io: aneto
is: dill
it: aneto
ja: イノンド
ka: კამა
kk: аскөк
kn: ಸಬ್ಬಸಿಗೆ
ko: 딜
la: anethum graveolens
lb: dëll
lo: ຜັກຊີ
lt: krapas
lv: dilles
mk: ко́пар
ml: ചതകുപ്പ
mr: शेपू
my: စမြိတ်ပင်
nb: dill
nl: dille
nn: dill
oc: anet
or: ସୋୟା
os: хъонтхора
pa: ਸੋਏ
pl: koper, koperek, koperku, kopru, koperkowy, koperkowe, koperkowa
pt: endro
ro: mărar
ru: укроп
sa: मिश्रेयसस्यम्
sd: سوئا
sh: kopar
sk: kôpor
sl: koper
sq: kopra
sr: мирођија
sv: dill
sw: bizari
ta: சதகுப்பி
te: శత పుష్పం
tg: шибит
th: ผักชีลาว
tr: dereotu
tt: шөер
uk: кріп
ur: شِبِت
vi: thì là
wo: anet
zh: 蒔蘿

en: dill sprig
fr: brin d'aneth, branche d'aneth

en: fresh dill sprig
fr: brin d'aneth frais, branche d'aneth frais

en: dill seed, dill seeds
da: dildfrø
de: Dillsaat
es: semillas de eneldo
fi: tillinsiemen
fr: graines d'aneth
hr: sjeme kopra
it: semi di aneto
nb: dillfrø
nl: dillezaad
nn: dillfrø
sv: dillfrö, dillfrön

en: dill butter
de: Dillbutter, Dill-Butter
fi: tillivoi
hr: maslac od kopra
it: burro all'aneto
sv: dillsmör

en: dill vinegar
da: dildeddike

en: rosemary
af: roosmaryn
bg: розмарин
bn: রোজমেরি
br: roumarin
bs: ruzmarin
ca: romaní
cs: rozmarýn
cy: rhosmari
da: rosmarin
de: rosmarin
el: δενδρολίβανο
es: romero
eu: erromero
fa: رومارن
fi: rosmariini
fr: romarin
ga: marós
gl: romeu
he: רוזמרין רפואי
hi: गुलमेंहदी
hr: ružmarin, ružmarina
ht: womaren
hu: rozmaring
hy: հազրեվարդ բուժիչ
ia: rosmarino
id: rosemary
io: rosmarino
is: rósmarín
it: rosmarino
ja: ローズマリー
ka: როზმარინი
kn: ರೋಸ್‌ಮರಿ
ko: 로즈메리
ky: розмарин
la: rosmarinus officinalis
lb: rousemaräin
lo: ຕົ້ນໂຣສ ເມຣີ
lt: rozmarinas
lv: rozmarīns
mk: рузмарин
ml: റോസ് മേരി
ms: rosmari
nb: rosmarin
nl: rozemarijn
nn: rosmarin
oc: romanin
pl: rozmaryn, rozmarynu
ps: اکليل
pt: alecrim
qu: sallika
ro: rozmarin
ru: розмарин
rw: romarin
sc: romasinu
sh: ružmarin
si: රෝස්මෙරි
sk: rozmarín
sl: rožmarin
sq: rozmarina
sr: рузмарин
sv: rosmarin
ta: ரோசுமேரி
th: โรสแมรี
tr: biberiye
uk: розмарин
vi: hương thảo
zh: 迷迭香

en: rosemary sprig
fr: brin de romarin, branche de romarin

en: fresh rosemary
fr: romarin frais
it: rosmarino fresco

en: Dried rosemary
fr: romarin séché
it: rosmarino essiccato

en: lemongrass, lemon grass
am: ጠጅ ሳር
ar: إذخر ليموني
bg: лимонена трева
bn: গন্ধবেণা
ca: Canya llimona
da: citrongræs
de: Zitronengras
dv: ކާސިންޖީ
es: hierba limón, hierbalimón, citronella
fa: پوتار
fi: Sitruunaruoho
fr: citronnelle, citronelle
ga: féar líomóideach
gl: Herba limoeira
he: עשב לימון
hi: लेमन ग्रास
hr: limunska trava
id: Serai
io: citron-suko
it: citronella
ja: レモングラス
ko: 레몬그래스
la: Cymbopogon citratus
lg: Kalifuwa
lo: ຫົວສີໄຄ
mr: गवती चहा
ms: daun serai
nb: sitrongress
ne: कागते घाँस
nl: citroengras, Sereh
or: ଲେମନ ଗ୍ରାସ୍
pa: ਲੈਮਨ ਗਰਾਸ
pl: trawa cytrynowa, trawy cytrynowej
pt: erva-principe
ro: iarbă de lămâie
sq: barishte
sr: Лимун-трава
sv: citrongräs, citrongras
th: ตะไคร้
vi: Sả chanh
zh: 柠檬草

en: lemongrass stalk
fr: tige de citronnelle

en: mint, Pudina
af: ment
am: እባን
ar: نعناع
az: nanə
be: мята
bg: мента
bn: মেন্থা
br: bent
bs: metvica
ca: menta
co: mente
cs: máta
cy: mintys
da: mynte
de: Minze, Minzen
el: μέντα
eo: mento
es: menta
et: münt
eu: menda
fa: نعنا
fi: minttu, mintut
fr: menthe
ga: mismín
gl: menta
he: נענע
hi: पुदिना
hr: metvica
ht: mant
hu: menta
hy: դաղձ
id: mentha
io: minto
is: myntur
it: menta
ja: ハッカ属
jv: mentha
ka: პიტნა
kk: жалбыз
ko: 멘타
ku: pûjan
ky: эгилме жалбыз
la: mentha
lt: mėta
lv: mētras
mk: нане
ml: കർപ്പൂരതുളസി
mt: nagħniegħ
my: ပူဒီနာ
nb: mynteslekta
nl: munt, muntblad, zacht muntblad
nn: mynteslekta
oc: menta
or: ପୋଦିନା
os: битъына
pa: ਪੁਦੀਨਾ
pl: mięta, mięty, miętowy, miętowa, miętowe
pt: mentha
ro: mentă
ru: мята
se: minta
sh: metvica
si: මිංචි ගණය
sk: mäta
sl: meta
sq: nenexhik
sr: нана
sv: mynta
ta: புதினா
te: మెంథా
tg: пудина
th: มินต์
tl: malipukon
tr: nane
tt: бөтнек
uk: м'ята
uz: yalpiz
vi: chi bạc hà
wo: naana
yi: מענטא
za: bozhoz
zh: 薄荷

en: mint leaf, mint leaves
bg: листа от мента
de: Minzblätter
es: hojas de menta, hoja de menta, menta en hojas
fi: mintunlehti, mintunlehdet
fr: feuilles de menthe
hr: list metvice
it: foglio di menta, foglie di menta intere
pl: liść mięty, liście mięty

en: mint sprig
fr: brin de menthe, branche de menthe

en: spearmint leaf, spearmint leaves
fr: feuille de menthe verte

en: fresh spearmint leaf, fresh spearmint leaves
fr: feuille de menthe verte fraîche, feuille fraîche de menthe verte

en: mint oil
bg: ментово масло
cs: mátový olej
es: aceite de menta
fr: huile de menthe
hr: ulje od mente
it: olio di menta
nl: muntolie
pl: olejek miętowy